District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.01

Repealed

Establishment of the Citywide Call Center.

Repealed.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1002, 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1203(b)(2), 49 DCR 6968
1981 Ed., § 1-368.1.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1002 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1002 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1204 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).

Section 1203(b)(1) of D.C. Law 14-190 abolished the Citywide Call Center, established by § 1-327.01.

Section 17 of D.C. Law 15-105 made a technical amendment to D.C. Law 14-190 that did not affect this section.